Washington statutes.
RCW 16.52.095

Certain veterinary procedures—Misdemeanor.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, it is a misdemeanor:

(a) For any person to cut off more than one-half of the ear or ears of any domestic animal such as an ox, cow, bull, calf, sheep, goat, or hog; or

(b) For any person to:

(i) Devocalize a dog;

(ii) Crop or cut off any part of the ear of a dog; or

(iii) Crop or cut off any part of the tail of a dog that is seven days old or older, or has opened its eyes, whichever occurs sooner.

(2) This section does not apply if the person performing the procedure is a licensed veterinarian utilizing accepted veterinary surgical protocols that may include local anesthesia, general anesthesia, or perioperative pain management.

[ 2020 c 158 s 4; 1994 c 261 s 7; Code 1881 s 840; 1871 p 103 s 1; RRS s 3206. Formerly RCW 16.52.090, part.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—1994 c 261: See note following RCW 16.52.011.